Utah statutes.
76-8-419.   Damaging highways or bridges.

(1)  Every person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly digs up, removes, displaces, breaks, or otherwise damages or destroys any public highway, or any private way laid out by authority of law, or any bridge upon the highway or private way is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

(2)  If the violation of this section constitutes an offense subject to a greater penalty under another provision of Title 76, Utah Criminal Code, than is provided under this section, this section does not prohibit the prosecution and sentencing for the offense subject to a greater penalty.

